src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Burmese language nouns inflect in cases.

! Lexicon containing POS tag only:
# ;

LEXICON N
+N: N-suff ;

! Lexicon containing inflectional suffixes and corresponding tags:
LEXICON N-suff
+Pl+Sub: များက   # ;
+Sub: က  # ;
+Pl: များ  # ;
+Pl+Obj: များကို    # ;
+Obj: ကို   # ;
+Pl+Top: များဟာ   # ;
+Top: ဟာ  # ;
# ;
! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
